Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.023

Authority of fiduciary to invest in certain enterprises.

Subject to the standards of RCW 11.100.020, a fiduciary is authorized to invest in new, unproven, untried, or other enterprises with a potential for significant growth whether producing a current return, either by investing directly therein or by investing as a limited partner or otherwise in one or more commingled funds which in turn invest primarily in such enterprises. The aggregate amount of investments held by a fiduciary under the authority of this section valued at cost shall not exceed ten percent of the net fair market value of the trust corpus, including investments made under the authority of this section valued at fair market value, immediately after any such investment is made. Any investment which would have been authorized by this section if in force at the time the investment was made is hereby authorized.

[ 1985 c 30 s 66. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 98.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.